Maryland, session 2025, SB0984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
12–106.
(b) This section applies only to a binder or policy, other than a renewal policy, of
personal insurance, commercial property insurance, and commercial liability insurance.
12–307.
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 12–106 OF THIS TITLE, WITH RESPECT TO PRIVATE
PASSENGER MOTOR VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICIES THAT MEASURE THE
OPERATION OF AN INSURED VEHICLE, AN INSURER MAY NOT INITIATE A PREMIUM
INCREASE IN INCREMENTS OF LESS THAN 6 MONTHS FROM THE DATE THE POLICY
GOES INTO EFFECT.
19–521.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TELEMATICS” MEANS A METHOD OF COLLECTING
DATA RELATED TO ANY OF THE FOLLOWING DATA POINTS REGARDING A VEHICLE OR
DRIVER USING RECORDING SENSORS OR A TELECOMMUNICATIONS DEVICE FOR
TRANSMITTAL OF THE DATA, AND A SECURED SERVER TO STORE THE DATA:
(1) VEHICLE SPEED, LOCATION, MILEAGE, AND OPERATING HOURS;
(2) DRIVER ACCELERATION, BRAKING, AND CORNERING HABITS;
(3) ENGINE DIAGNOSTICS; AND

SENATE BILL 984 3
(4) ANY OTHER DATA POINT RELATED TO THE USE AND OPERATION
OF THE INSURED VEHICLE THAT HAS BEEN FILED WITH AND APPROVED BY THE
COMMISSIONER.
(B) (A) (1) AN INSURER THAT ISSUES, SELLS, OR DELIVERS PRIVATE
PASSENGER MOTOR VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICIES IN THE STATE SHALL DISCLOSE
TO THE INSURED APPLICANT AT THE TIME OF APPLICATION OR THE POLICYHOLDER
AT THE TIME OF RENEWAL ANY USE OF TELEMATICS TO OBTAIN DATA OF THE
INSURED’S DRIVING HABITS OR A PROGRAM THAT MEASURES THE OPERATION OF AN
INSURED VEHICLE.
(2) THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(B) AN INSURER THAT IMPLEMENTS THE USE OF A PROGRAM THAT
MEASURES THE OPERATION OF AN INSURED VEHICLE SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS
BY WHICH THE POLICYHOLDER MAY CORRECT OR APPEAL DATA COLLECTED
THROUGH THE PROGRAM THAT THE POLICYHOLDER BELIEVES IS ERRONEOUS.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO LIMIT THE
TYPES AND AMOUNT OF DATA THAT MAY BE COLLECTED BY TELEMATICS SYSTEMS A
PROGRAM THAT MEASURES THE OPERATION OF AN INSURED VEHICLE FOR USE BY
AN INSURER THAT ISSUES, SELLS, OR DELIVERS PRIVATE PASSENGER MOTOR
VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICIES IN THE STATE.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REQUIRE AN INSURER THAT USES A
TELEMATICS SYSTEM PROGRAM THAT MEASURES THE OPERATION OF AN INSURED
VEHICLE TO PERIODICALLY ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT A GOVERNANCE PLAN
THAT INCLUDES:
(1) AUDIT THE TELEMATICS SYSTEM TO ENSURE THAT IT COLLECTS,
PROCESSES, AND CALCULATES THE IMPACT OF DATA ON INSURER–WIDE PREMIUM
RATES IN A MANNER THAT IS ACTUARIALLY SOUND AND FREE OF UNFAIR BIAS
MONITORING THE PROGRAM TO ENSURE THAT IT DOES NOT COLLECT OR PROCESS
DATA IN A MANNER THAT IS UNFAIRLY DISCRIMINATORY, IMPACTS PREMIUM RATES
IN A MANNER THAT LACKS ACTUARIAL JUSTIFICATION, OR OTHERWISE VIOLATES
THIS ARTICLE;
(2) CORRECTING OR MITIGATING A FINDING THAT THE PROGRAM
COLLECTS OR PROCESSES DATA IN A MANNER THAT IS UNFAIRLY DISCRIMINATORY,
IMPACTS PREMIUM RATES IN A MANNER THAT LACKS ACTUARIAL JUSTIFICATION,
OR OTHERWISE VIOLATES THIS ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 984
(2) (3) SUBMIT A REPORT PERIODICALLY REPORTING TO THE
ADMINISTRATION SUMMARIZING ON:
(I) THE SCOPE, METHODOLOGIES, AND FINDINGS OF THE
AUDIT PROGRAM MONITORING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GOVERNANCE PLAN; AND
(II) ANY CORRECTIVE ACTION OR MITIGATION MEASURE TAKEN
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GOVERNANCE PLAN.
27–501.
(t) With respect to private passenger motor vehicle insurance, an insurer may
not:
(1) require an applicant or a policyholder to participate in a program that
measures the operation of an insured vehicle as a condition for underwriting a private
passenger motor vehicle insurance risk [unless the insurer:
(1) only offers private passenger motor vehicle insurance products that
require insureds to participate in a program that measures the operation of an insured
vehicle;
(2) discloses the information in item (1) of this subsection to:
(i) the applicant at the time of application; and
(ii) the policyholder at the time of renewal; and
(3) includes the information in item (1) of this subsection in any advertising
materials for the insurance products offered by the insurer]; OR
(2) USE DATA COLLECTED THROUGH A PROGRAM THAT MEASURES
THE OPERATION OF AN INSURED VEHICLE TO CANCEL, REFUSE TO RENEW, OR
REFUSE TO UNDERWRITE A PRIVATE PASSENGER AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE POLICY
RISK.
27–908.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TELEMATICS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 19–521
OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) AN INSURER THAT ISSUES, SELLS, OR DELIVERS PRIVATE PASSENGER
MOTOR VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICIES IN THE STATE MAY NOT USE DATA OBTAINED
THROUGH TELEMATICS FROM A SPECIFIC VEHICLE, WHOLLY OR PARTLY:

SENATE BILL 984 5
(1) FOR ESTABLISHING AN INSURANCE PREMIUM FOR THE POLICY
THAT INSURES THAT VEHICLE; OR
(2) TO CANCEL, REFUSE TO RENEW, OR REFUSE TO UNDERWRITE A
PRIVATE PASSENGER AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE POLICY.
(C) AN INSURER THAT IMPLEMENTS THE USE OF A TELEMATICS SYSTEM
SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS BY WHICH THE POLICYHOLDER MAY CORRECT OR
APPEAL TELEMATICS DATA THAT THE POLICYHOLDER BELIEVES IS ERRONEOUS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Insurance
Administration shall adopt the regulations required under § 19–521(c) of the Insurance
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on or before December 31, 2025 July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.